Mississippi, session 2026, HB628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 49-15-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-15-79.  (1)  (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, it is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to use or attempt to use a purse seine for the taking of fish or to have such seine in the water within one (1) mile of the shoreline of the County of Jackson, Hancock or Harrison in the State of Mississippi.  The Boards of Supervisors of Hancock, Harrison and Jackson Counties shall have the authority to submit proposed regulations to the commission to regulate within their respective counties the use of and trammel nets.  The commission may consider all such proposals submitted by the boards of supervisors in formulating regulations to be promulgated under this section. (b)  It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to use or attempt to use a purse seine for the taking of menhaden or to have such seine in the water within one (1) mile of the southern shoreline of the Mississippi coastal barrier islands. (2)  A person, firm or corporation convicted of a violation of this section or regulations promulgated under this section shall be punished by the penalties provided in Section 49-15-100(2), Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 2.  Section 49-15-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-15-35.  * * *Upon the request of the boards of supervisors of the respective coastal counties, the department may adopt ordinances prohibiting The taking and catching of menhaden is prohibited within * * *certain limits of the coast line of the county so requesting, but the department shall not fix such limits except upon request of the board of supervisors, and such limit shall not exceed two (2) miles from the shore line, or two (2) miles from the corporate limit boundaries of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound one (1) mile of the southern shoreline of the Mississippi coastal barrier islands. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.